Utah statutes.
10-9a-504.   Temporary land use regulations.

(1) (a)  A municipal legislative body may, without prior consideration of or recommendation from the planning commission, enact an ordinance establishing a temporary land use regulation for any part or all of the area within the municipality if:

(i)  the legislative body makes a finding of compelling, countervailing public interest; or

(ii)  the area is unregulated.

(b)  A temporary land use regulation under Subsection (1)(a) may prohibit or regulate the erection, construction, reconstruction, or alteration of any building or structure or any subdivision approval.

(c)  A temporary land use regulation under Subsection (1)(a) may not impose an impact fee or other financial requirement on building or development.

(2)  The municipal legislative body shall establish a period of limited effect for the ordinance not to exceed six months.

(3) (a)  A municipal legislative body may, without prior planning commission consideration or recommendation, enact an ordinance establishing a temporary land use regulation prohibiting construction, subdivision approval, and other development activities within an area that is the subject of an Environmental Impact Statement or a Major Investment Study examining the area as a proposed highway or transportation corridor.

(b)  A regulation under Subsection (3)(a):

(i)  may not exceed six months in duration;

(ii)  may be renewed, if requested by the Transportation Commission created under Section 72-1-301, for up to two additional six-month periods by ordinance enacted before the expiration of the previous regulation; and

(iii)  notwithstanding Subsections (3)(b)(i) and (ii), is effective only as long as the Environmental Impact Statement or Major Investment Study is in progress.

